Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4075.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 285A.
SECTION 2. (1) On or before April 1, 2027, the State Treasurer shall guarantee an eligible
rural hospital stabilization loan under this section.
(2) A rural hospital stabilization loan that is eligible to be guaranteed under this section
must:
(a) Be made to a hospital that:
(A) Is governed by a publicly elected board; and
(B) Receives Medicare reimbursement on the basis of diagnostic related groups;
(b) Be used only to address cash shortages or to refinance existing debt and not to ex-
pand services, facilities or operations or to make capital improvements;
(c) Have a maturity date of no later than 20 years after the closing date of the loan;
(d) Be a fully amortized loan with no provisions allowing or requiring interest-only or
balloon payments;
(e) Be made by a single lender or loan syndicate;
(f) Be secured by a first position lien on substantially all of the hospital’s real property
and material equipment;
(g) Provide the State of Oregon with all rights typical of a secured party in a commercial
transaction;
(h) Require the hospital and lender to exercise all commercially reasonable efforts, not
including foreclosure upon the hospital’s real property or equipment securing the loan, to
meet the debt obligation before pursuing the guarantee;
(i) Be provided to the State Treasurer; and
(j) Require the hospital or lender to give prompt notice to the State Treasurer:
(A) When the loan is paid in full;
(B) If servicing of the loan is transferred;
(C) If the loan is in default; or
(D) If the hospital executes additional loan agreements or modifications to the loan
guaranteed under this section.
(3) The guarantee of a loan under this section terminates upon the earliest of:
Enrolled House Bill 4075 (HB 4075-A) Page 1

(a) Thirty days following the loan’s maturity date;
(b) Replacement of the loan guaranteed under this section with a new loan to the hospi-
tal; or
(c) Full repayment of the loan to the guaranteed lender.
(4) A hospital whose loan is guaranteed under this section shall provide annual reports
to the State Treasurer indicating:
(a) The outstanding loan balance;
(b) The repayment status of the loan; and
(c) The financial standing of the hospital.
(5) A guarantee issued under this section may only be payable from moneys in the Un-
claimed Property and Estates Fund established under ORS 98.389 and does not constitute a
debt or obligation of the State of Oregon.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 98.302 to
98.436.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding ORS 98.389 (3), the State Treasurer shall expend up to $44
million of the moneys in the Unclaimed Property and Estates Fund established under ORS
98.389 as needed to fulfill contractual obligations on a guarantee issued under section 2 of
this 2026 Act.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2048.
SECTION 6. Section 4 of this 2026 Act does not become operative until and unless, on or
before April 1, 2027, a loan is guaranteed under section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 5, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 6, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4075 (HB 4075-A) Page 2